Vermont, session 2025-2026, H185.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #379757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.185
2025 Page 2 of 6
(1) Good access to primary care is essential for the health of
Vermonters, but Vermont’s health care system currently does not provide
access to primary care with the timeliness and scope that Vermonters need.
(2) Primary care clinicians face significant administrative burdens
imposed by health networks and by both public and private insurance plans.
Primary care clinicians are also not compensated commensurate with their
value to the health care system. As a result, many primary care clinicians are
leaving their Vermont practices and too few new clinicians are replacing them.
(3) Good access to primary care saves health care system costs by
reducing the need for more costly services, but Vermont’s health care system is
in a state of crisis. Premiums in the commercial health insurance markets are
increasingly out of reach for individual Vermonters, their families, private
employers, and public employers such as schools and State and local
governments. Some hospital costs in particular are grossly excessive. Cost
containment efforts such as OneCare Vermont have failed to achieve their
desired goals. New initiatives such as the AHEAD model are limited in scope
and may take years before they achieve meaningful cost containment.
Universal primary care is Vermont’s best opportunity over the short term for
improvement in Vermont’s health care system.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a universal primary
care program that will promote the public good by increasing access to primary
VT LEG #379757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.185
2025 Page 3 of 6
care, thereby improving the health of Vermonters and reducing health care
system costs.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9375(b) is amended to read:
(b) The Board shall have the following duties:
* * *
(16) Develop and implement a universal primary care program as set
forth in section 9384 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 9384 is added to read:
§ 9384. UNIVERSAL PRIMARY CARE PROGRAM
(a) The Green Mountain Care Board, in consultation with interested
stakeholders, shall develop and implement by rule a universal primary care
program that will promote the public good by increasing access to primary care
and reducing health system costs.
(b) The universal health care program shall do all of the following:
(1) Reduce or eliminate hospital and health network administrative
burdens.
(2) Reduce or eliminate administrative burdens imposed by health
insurers, public programs, and other payors.
(3) Provide universal access to primary care services for all Vermonters
without the requirement of enrollment in an insured or self-insured plan or in a
public program.
VT LEG #379757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.185
2025 Page 4 of 6
(4) Define primary care services to include primary care services,
outpatient mental health services, outpatient substance use disorder treatment
services, communicable disease testing, and vaccines.
(5) Eliminate health insurance cost-sharing for primary care services.
(6) Divest primary care practices from the controlling interests of
hospitals and health networks.
(7) Be funded by an allocation of premiums, premium equivalents, and,
to the extent permitted by federal law and federal initiatives such as the
AHEAD model, public program funds from Medicare and Medicaid. The
allocation shall be an appropriate percentage of premiums, premium
equivalents, and public program funds reflecting historical trends in
expenditures for primary care, with an additional increment of compensation if
warranted in order to increase access to primary care and reduce overall
Vermont health system costs.
(c) The Board may assess to Vermont hospitals and health networks its
reasonable and necessary expenses in developing, implementing, and
administering the universal primary care program, in proportion to the relative
annual operating expenses of the hospitals and health networks; provided,
however, that the Board may waive or reduce charges for one or more
hospitals or health networks if necessary given the financial condition of the
entity or entities.
VT LEG #379757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.185
2025 Page 5 of 6
(d) The Board may contract with a private entity or enter into an agreement
with the Vermont Medicaid program for the operation of a virtual payment
pool to collect the primary care allocation of premiums, premium equivalents,
and public program funds and to transmit per capita payments or another cost-
effective payment mechanism to primary care practices and practitioners.
(e) A primary care practice or practitioner under a universal primary care
program, or Vermont Medicaid or a private entity designated by the Board to
operate the virtual payment pool, may negotiate agreements with private, self-
insured plans for an appropriate allocation of premium equivalents to be paid
into the virtual payment pool, in amounts that do not unfairly disadvantage the
beneficiaries of insured plans, self-insured plans of public employees, and
public programs. In the absence of an appropriate agreement, a primary care
practice or practitioner may decline to participate in the private, self-insured
plan’s primary care network.
(f) The Green Mountain Care Board shall adopt rules in accordance with
3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to implement the program set forth in this section.
(g) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide funding to support an
increase in the number of medical school slots and residency slots for primary
care practitioners at the University of Vermont College of Medicine in order to
increase the supply of primary care practitioners in this State. It is the intent of
the General Assembly that the funding for these slots shall be derived by
VT LEG #379757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.185
2025 Page 6 of 6
annual appropriation, by an annual charge imposed by the Board on hospitals
and health systems, or by a combination of revenue sources. The Board shall
coordinate with the Office of Primary Care and Area Health Education Centers
Program (AHEC) at the University of Vermont College of Medicine to
establish the appropriate conditions on the use of the medical school or
residency funds in order to benefit Vermonters and Vermont’s health care
system.
Sec. 4. DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION REPORTS
On or before January 15, 2026 and January 15, 2027, the Green Mountain
Care Board shall report to the General Assembly on the status of its
rulemaking and on the development and implementation of the universal
primary care program set forth in Sec. 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage, with the universal primary care
program beginning operation not later than January 1, 2028.
VT LEG #379757 v.1